Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9N-104] Bail agent not to act as
attorney. A bail agent who is also an attorney shall not represent a
person to whom the attorney has furnished bail for compensation in any
proceeding for which the attorney has furnished bail. The commissioner may
place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a bail agent's license
and may levy a civil fine or penalty in accordance with articles 2 and 9A, or
any combination of these actions, for violation of this section. [L 2008, c
134, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next